Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1108.41
State comprehensive capital facilities plan; State Comprehensive Capital Facilities Planning Committee; termination; program statement; appropriation for drawings and construction; contracts; approval; report; contents.

(1) The division shall cause a state comprehensive capital facilities plan to be developed. The plan shall project the state's facilities needs for a period of six years and shall be based on programmatic projections and input from each state agency. To aid in the development of the plan prior to July 1, 2026, the Governor shall appoint a State Comprehensive Capital Facilities Planning Committee with representatives from various state agencies, and the committee shall develop and adopt comprehensive planning guidelines and a process of project prioritization. The committee terminates on July 1, 2026. Beginning July 1, 2026, the division shall be responsible for the comprehensive planning guidelines and the process of project prioritization. The state comprehensive capital facilities plan shall be submitted electronically to the Committee on Building Maintenance for review before such plan shall be submitted to the Governor and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst on or before November 15 prior to the beginning of each biennium. The plan submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Prior to July 1, 2026, the plan shall be based on priorities developed by the State Comprehensive Capital Facilities Planning Committee. The University of Nebraska and any Nebraska state college shall not be required to comply with or be subject to the provisions of this section since these agencies are subject to and participate in statewide facilities planning developed by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education pursuant to the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act.

(2) An appropriation for drawings and construction may be made only after submission of an acceptable program statement on or before September 15 of the year previous to the initiation of such appropriation. Such program statement shall include, but not be limited to, (a) an assessment of the compatibility of the project with the state comprehensive capital facilities plan and the agency or departmental comprehensive capital facilities plan, (b) the identification of the impact of the project on the space utilization of other facilities under the control of the agency or department, and (c) the identification of the future impact on the agency or departmental programmatic needs, demand for utilities in excess of current capacity, parking needs, street and road needs, and site acquisition needs. Such program statement shall be submitted to the division and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The program statement submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically.

(3) No contract for the planning, design, or construction of a new facility or major modification or repair of an existing facility provided for by any state appropriation may be initiated unless an acceptable program statement has been approved by the Governor, the agency or department has submitted to the division a certificate from the Committee on Building Maintenance that there is no state-owned property which is adequate or which through cost-effective renovation, as determined by the division, could be made adequate to meet the agency's or department's needs, and the conditions of the contracts are approved in writing by the division, except that the provisions of this section shall not apply to projects when the total design and construction cost of the project is less than the limit established by the division. Such program statements and contracts shall be reviewed by the division.

(4) The division shall file a written report on each program statement and contract reviewed with the Governor and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The report submitted to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. This report shall cover the consistency of the project with the state comprehensive capital facilities plan and the agency or departmental comprehensive capital facilities plan. A subsequent review and report upon completion of the planning or design phase of the project shall indicate the compatibility of the project with the agency or departmental comprehensive capital facilities plan, compare the probable cost of the project with accepted cost standards for similar construction projects, and review the relationship of the project to other state agency or departmental capital facilities in the same complex.

Laws 1969, c. 772, § 4, p. 2923;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1108.06;

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 34;

Laws 1976, LB 986, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 38, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 22;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 24;

Laws 1995, LB 530, § 14;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 24;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 184;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 50.

Committee on Building Maintenance, see section 81-185.

Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education, see Article VII, section 14, Constitution of Nebraska, and section 85-1403.

Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education Act, see section 85-1401.

These sections held not applicable to the Board of Regents which cannot delegate its constitutional powers and duties to other officers or agencies. Board of Regents v. Exon, 199 Neb. 146, 256 N.W.2d 330 (1977).